Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 4 Council on Maternal and Infant Health

31-4-1 through 31-4-3.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 635, §§ 1, 2, 3; Ga. L. 1974, p. 269, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1763, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 766, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-15/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-15/HB 228 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2009.